Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-399
Sections not applicable to intrastate commerce.

Sections 75-392 to 75-3,100 do not apply to a foreign or domestic motor carrier, private carrier, leasing company, broker, or freight forwarder, including a transporter of waste or recyclable materials, engaged exclusively in intrastate commerce.

Laws 2007, LB358, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 86.